en: Turrón, Turron
ca: Torró
de: Turrón
es: Turrones, Turrón
fr: Touron
hr: Turrón
it: Torrone
ja: トゥロン, トローネ
nl: Turrón

en: Chocolate turrón
de: Schokoturrón
es: Turrones de chocolate
fr: Turrón de chocolat
hr: Čokoladni turrón
it: Torrone al cioccolato, torrone di cioccolato
lt: Šokoladinis turrón
nl: Chocolade turrón

en: Chocolate turrón with almonds, Black chocolate turrón with almonds
de: Schokoturrón mit Mandeln, Schwarzer Schokoturrón mit Mandeln
es: Turrones de chocolate con almendras, Turrones de chocolate negro con almendras
fr: Turrón de chocolat aux amandes, Turrón au chocolat noir aux amandes
hr: Čokoladni turrón s bademima
lt: Šokoladinis turrón su migdolais

en: Chocolate turrón with puffed rice, black chocolate turrón with puffed rice
de: Schokoturrón mit Puffreis, Schwarzer Schokoturrón mit Puffreis
es: Turrones de chocolate con arroz inflado, Turrones de chocolate negro con arroz inflado
fr: Turrón au chocolat avec riz soufflé, turrón au chocolat noir avec riz soufflé
hr: Čokoladni turrón s lisnatom rižom
lt: Šokoladinis turrón su pūstais ryžiais

en: Coconut turrón
de: Kokosnussturrón
es: Turrones de coco
fr: Touron à la noix de coco
hr: Kokos turron
lt: Kokosų turrón

en: Almond turrón
de: Mandelturrón
es: Turrones de almendras, Turrones de almendra
fi: Manteliturrón
fr: Tourons aux amandes
hr: Badem turrón
it: Torrone alle mandorle
lt: Migdolų turrón
nl: Amandelturrón
zh: 杏仁糖杜隆

en: Creamy almond turrón, Soft almond turrón, Jijona turrón
de: Cremiges Mandelturrón
es: Turrones blandos de almendras, Turrones blandos, Turrones de tipo Jijona, Turrones de Jijona
fr: Tourons crémeux aux amandes
hr: Kremasti badem turrón
it: Torrone di Jijona, torrone cremoso alle mandorle
nl: Zachte turrón

en: Crunchy almond turrón, Hard almond turrón, Alicante turrón
de: Knuspriges Mandelturrón
es: Turrones duros de almendras, Turrones duros, Turrones de tipo Alicante
fr: Tourons croquants aux amandes, tourons d'Alicante
hr: Hrskavi badem turrón
it: Torrone croccante alle mandorle
nl: Harde turrón

en: Peanut turrón, Peanuts turrón
de: Erdnussturrón
es: Turrones de cacahuete, Turrones de maní
fi: Maapähkinäturrón
fr: Tourons aux cacahuètes
hr: Kikiriki turrón
lt: Žemės riešutų turrón
nl: Pindanturrón

en: Creamy peanut turrón
de: Cremiges Erdnussturrón
es: Turrónes blandos de cacahuete
fi: Kermainen maapähkinäturrón
fr: Tourons crémeux aux cacahuètes
hr: Kremasti turrón od kikirikija

en: Crunchy peanut turrón
de: Knuspriges Erdnussturrón
es: Turrónes duros de cacahuete
fi: Rapea maapähkinäturrón
fr: Tourons croquants aux cacahuètes
hr: Hrskavi turrón od kikirikija

en: Fruit turrón
de: Fruchtturrón
es: Turrones de frutas
fr: Turrón aux fruits
hr: Voće turrón
lt: Vaisių turrón

en: Guirlache turrón, Turrón de guirlache
de: Turron de Guirlache, Mandel-Karamel-Turrón
es: Turrones de guirlache
fr: Touron de guirlache
hr: Guirlache turrón

en: Toasted egg yolk turrón
de: Spanischer Weißer Nougat
es: Turrones de yema tostada
fr: Tourons au jaune d'œuf grillé
hr: Prepečeni žumanjak turrón

en: Walnut creme turrón
es: Turrones de nata y nueces
fr: Touron à la crème de noix
hr: Krema od oraha turrón

en: Fruit pastes
de: Fruchtpaste
es: Dulces de frutas, Pastas de frutas, Cremas de frutas
fi: hedelmätahnat
fr: Pâtes de fruits, Pâte de fruit, Pâtes de fruit, Pâte de fruits
hr: Voćne paste
it: Impasti di frutta
lt: Vaisių pasta
nl: Vruchtenpastas, Vruchtenpasta's, Vruchtenkaasjes

en: Fruit paste variety packs
de: Assortimente von Fruchtpasten, Fruchtpaste-assortiemente
fr: Assortiments de pâtes de fruits
hr: Različita pakiranja voćne paste
nl: Vruchtenpasta-assortimenten

en: Apple pastes
de: Apfelpaste
es: Dulces de manzana, Pastas de manzana, Cremas de manzana
fr: Pâtes de pommes
hr: Paste od jabuka
lt: Obuolių pasta
nl: Appelpastas

en: Guava pastes
de: Guavenpaste
es: Dulces de guayaba, Pastas de guayaba, Cremas de guayaba
fr: Pâtes de goyaves, Pâte de goyave
hr: Paste od guave
lt: Gvajavų pasta
nl: Guavepastas

en: Multifruit pastes
de: Multifruchtpaste
es: Dulces multifruta, Pastas multifruta, Cremas multifruta
fi: Monihedelmätahnat
fr: Pâtes de fruits multifruits
hr: Multivoćne paste
lt: Įvairių vaisių pasta
nl: Multifruitpastas